Hawaii statutes.
§461J-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Board" means the board of physical
therapy.

"Competence" is the application of
knowledge, skills, and behaviors required to function effectively, safely,
ethically, and legally within the context of the individual's role and
environment.

"Continuing competence" is the
lifelong process of maintaining and documenting competence through ongoing
self-assessment, development, and implementation of a personal learning plan,
and subsequent reassessment.

"Educational institution" means
public schools as defined under chapter 302A, privately operated schools of
lower education, and colleges, the University of Hawaii, and other
universities.

"Foreign-trained person" means a
person who has completed an educational program or course of study in physical
therapy in an institution located outside the United States.

"Physical therapist" means a person
who is licensed to practice physical therapy in this State.

"Physical therapist assistant" means
a person who is licensed as a physical therapist assistant in the State and
assists the physical therapist in selected components of treatment or
intervention.

"Physical therapy" or "physical
therapy services" means the examination, treatment, and instruction of
human beings to detect, assess, prevent, correct, alleviate, and limit physical
disability, bodily malfunction, pain from injury, disease, and any other
physical or mental condition as performed by a physical therapist appropriately
licensed under this chapter. It includes but is not limited to:

(1) Administration, evaluation, modification of
treatment, and instruction involving the use of physical measures, activities,
and devices, for preventive and therapeutic purposes; provided that should the
care or treatment given by a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant
contravene treatment diagnosed or prescribed by a medical doctor, osteopath, or
as determined by the board, the physical therapist shall confer with the
professional regarding the manner or course of treatment in conflict and take
appropriate action in the best interest of the patient; and

(2) The provision of consultative, educational, and
other advisory services for the purpose of reducing the incidence and severity
of physical disability, bodily malfunction, or pain.

"Practice of physical therapy"
includes, but is not limited to, the use of the following:

(1) Physical agents, such as heat, cold, water, air,
sound, compression, light, electricity, and electromagnetic radiation;

(2) Exercise with or without devices, joint
mobilization, mechanical stimulation; biofeedback; postural drainage; traction;
positioning, massage, splinting, training in locomotion, and other functional
activities with or without assisting devices; and correction of posture, body
mechanics, and gait;

(3) Tests and measurements of: muscle strength,
force, endurance, and tone; joint motion, mobility, and stability; reflexes and
automatic reaction; movement skill and accuracy; sensation and perception;
peripheral nerve integrity; locomotor skill, stability, and endurance;
activities of daily living; cardiac, pulmonary, and vascular functions; the
fit, function, and comfort of prosthetic, orthotic, and other assisting
devices; posture and body mechanics; limb strength, circumference, and volume;
thoracic excursion and breathing patterns; vital signs; nature and locus of
pain and conditions under which pain varies; photosensitivity; and the home and
work physical environments.

"Unit" is a relative value assigned
to continuing competence activities in which one continuing competence unit is
equivalent to at least fifty minutes of classroom or hands-on instruction. [L
1985, c 276, pt of §1; am L 1986, c 140, §3; am L 1996, c 89, §16; am L 2013, c
35, §2 and c 220, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next